Hawaii statutes.
§386-93 Costs. (a) If the director of
labor and industrial relations, appellate board, or any court finds that
proceedings under this chapter have been brought, prosecuted, or defended
without reasonable ground, the whole costs of the proceedings including
reasonable attorney's fees may be assessed against the party who has brought,
prosecuted, or defended the proceedings.

(b) If an employer appeals a decision of the
director or appellate board, the costs of the proceedings of the appellate
board or the appellate court, together with reasonable attorney's fees, shall
be assessed against the employer if the employer loses; provided that if an
employer or an insurance carrier, other than the employer who appealed, is held
liable for compensation, the costs of the proceedings of the appellate board or
the appellate court, together with reasonable attorney's fees, shall be
assessed against the party held liable for the compensation. [L 1963, c 116, pt
of §1; Supp, §97-102; am L 1967, c 180, §1; HRS §386-93; am L 1969, c 244, §2g;
am L 2004, c 202, §45; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1; am L 2012, c
234, §1]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 54(d).

Law Journals and Reviews

One-Sided Bargain? Assessing the Fairness of Hawai‘i's
Workers' Compensation Law. 31 UH L. Rev. 553 (2009).

Case Notes

Attorney fees. 35 H. 591 (1940).

Reasonable grounds. 38 H. 405 (1949).

Party who prevailed on the crucial issue held to be the
prevailing party. 57 H. 535, 560 P.2d 1292 (1977).

Imposes liability for costs and fees incurred by nonappealing
employer on appealing employer who loses. 66 H. 290, 660 P.2d 1316 (1983).

An order regarding the award or denial of attorney's fees and
costs with respect to subsection (b) is a final order under §91-14(a) for
purposes of appeal; this final order rule applies prospectively to prevent
injustice; subsection (b) allows assessment of attorney's fees and costs
against an employer if the employer loses the final appeal. 104 H. 164, 86
P.3d 973 (2004).

Where appeals court's opinion regarding attorney's fees and
costs under this section was not ripe for decision, constituted an advisory
opinion akin to the issuance of an opinion when there was no subject matter
jurisdiction, and constituted inappropriate judicial interference with an
administrative decision of an entity within a separate, co-equal branch that
had not been formalized and had not yet affected the challenging parties in a
concrete way, thereby implicating separation-of-powers concerns, the appeals
court's exercise of appellate power constituted error. 121 H. 33, 211 P.3d 750
(2009).

Imposes liability for costs and fees incurred by nonappealing
employer on appealing employer who loses; "crucial issue" test
applied. 5 H. App. 521, 704 P.2d 914 (1985).

When employer appeals decision of director or appeals board
and subsequently withdraws either entire appeal or any portion of appeal, or
concedes, the decision of director or appeals board becomes final and employer
is considered losing party for purposes of subsection (b). 84 H. 390 (App.),
935 P.2d 105 (1997).

Cited: 33 H. 634 (1935).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next